California statutes. Financial Code
(2) That continued or resumed service or participation by the subject person or former subject person may pose a threat to the interests of the members of the subject institution or may threaten to impair public confidence in the subject institution.

(b) An order issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall remain in effect until the indictment or the information, complaint, or similar pleading is finally disposed of or, if the order is earlier terminated by the commissioner, until the order is so terminated.

(c) If the commissioner finds that the factors set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) are true with respect to a subject person or former
 subject person of a subject institution, the commissioner may, without any prior notice or hearing, issue an order suspending or removing the subject person or former subject person from his or her office, if any, with the subject institution and prohibiting him or her from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the affairs of the subject institution without the approval of the commissioner:

(1) That the subject person or former subject person has been finally convicted of any crime of the type described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). For purposes of this paragraph, an agreement to enter a pretrial diversion or similar program is deemed to be a conviction.

(2) That continued or resumed service or participation by the subject person or former subject person may pose a threat to the interests of the members of the subject institution or may threaten to impair
 public confidence in the subject institution.

(d) (1) (A) Within 30 days after an order is issued pursuant to subdivision (a) or (c), any subject person or former subject person of a subject institution to whom the order is issued may file with the commissioner an application for a hearing on the order.

(B) If the commissioner fails to commence the hearing within 15 business days after the application is filed with the commissioner or within any longer period to which the subject person or former subject person consents, the order shall be deemed rescinded.

(C) Within 30 days after the hearing or within any longer period to which the subject person or former subject person consents, the commissioner shall affirm, modify, or rescind the order. If the commissioner fails to
 affirm, modify, or rescind the order within this time limit, the order shall be deemed rescinded.

(2) The right of any subject person or former subject person of a subject institution to whom an order is issued pursuant to subdivision (a) or (c) to petition for judicial review of the order shall not be affected by the failure of the person to apply to the commissioner for a hearing on the order pursuant to paragraph (1).

(e) The fact that any subject person of a subject institution charged with a crime of the type described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) is not finally convicted of the crime does not preclude the commissioner from issuing an order regarding the subject person pursuant to any other section of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 32.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14311.

(a) Any subject institution, subject person of a subject institution, or former subject person of a subject institution to whom an order is issued under Sections 14308 to 14310, inclusive, may apply to the commissioner to modify or rescind the order. In deciding the application, the commissioner shall consider whether it is in the public interest to modify or rescind the order and whether it is reasonable to believe that the subject person or former subject person will, if and when he or she becomes a subject person of a subject
 institution, comply with all applicable provisions of this division and of any regulation or order issued under this division.

(b) The right of any subject institution, subject person of a subject institution, or former subject person of a subject institution to whom an order is issued under Sections 14308 to 14310, inclusive, to petition for judicial review of the order shall not be affected by the failure of the subject institution, subject person, or former subject person to apply to the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (a) to modify or rescind the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 33.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14312.

(a) For purposes of this section, “subject depository institution” means any of the following:

(1) A credit union that is organized under the laws of this state or that maintains an office in this state.

(2) An affiliate of an institution specified in paragraph (1).

(b) It shall be unlawful for a subject person or former subject person of a subject
 institution to whom an order is issued under Sections 14308 to 14310, inclusive, willfully to do, directly or indirectly, any of the following without the approval of the commissioner so long as the order is in effect:

(1) To act as a subject person of any subject depository institution.

(2) To vote any shares or other securities having voting rights for the election of any person as a director of a subject depository institution.

(3) To solicit, procure, transfer or attempt to transfer, or vote any proxy, consent, or authorization with respect to any shares or other securities of a subject depository institution having voting rights.

(4) To otherwise participate in any manner in the conduct of the affairs of any subject depository
 institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 34.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14313.

If the commissioner finds that any of the factors set forth in subdivisions (a) to (g), inclusive, are true with respect to a California credit union, the commissioner may by order, without any prior notice or hearing, take possession of the property and business of the California credit union:

(a) That the California credit union has violated any provision of
 this division, of another applicable law, of any order issued under this division, or of any written agreement with the commissioner, or has committed a material violation of any regulation of the commissioner.

(b) That the California credit union is conducting its business in an unsafe or unsound manner.

(c) That the California credit union is in such condition that it is unsafe or unsound for it to transact credit union business.

(d) That the California credit union has inadequate net worth or is insolvent. The net worth of the credit union shall be considered inadequate if it is less than 2 percent of the credit union’s total assets. 

(e) That the California credit union failed to pay any of its obligations as they came due or is reasonably expected
 to be unable to pay its obligations as they come due.

(f) That the California credit union has ceased to transact credit union business.

(g) That the California credit union has, with the approval of its board, requested the commissioner to take possession of its property and business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 532, Sec. 48.   (AB 1268)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14314.

(a) If the commissioner takes possession of the property and business of a California credit union pursuant to Section 14313, the California credit union may, within 10 days, apply to the superior court in the county where its principal executive office is located to enjoin further proceedings. The court may, after citing the commissioner to show cause why further proceedings should not be enjoined and after a hearing, dismiss the application or enjoin the commissioner from further proceedings and order the commissioner to surrender the
 property and business of the California credit union to the California credit union or make any further order as may be just. The judgment of the court may be appealed by the commissioner or by the California credit union in the manner provided by law for appeals from the judgment of a superior court.

(b) At any time after the commissioner takes possession of the property and business of a California credit union pursuant to Section 14313, the California credit union may, with the approval of the commissioner, resume business upon conditions as the commissioner may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 36.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14315.

(a) On taking possession of the business and assets of any credit union as provided in this chapter, the commissioner may proceed to liquidate the credit union in the manner provided by Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 600) of Division 1, and the provisions of that chapter, except Sections 700, 701, 702, and 710, shall apply as if the California credit union were a California state commercial bank, or he or she may appoint a liquidating agent or a liquidating committee of three members of the credit union to liquidate the business and assets of the credit union in the manner provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 15250) of Chapter 9, except that in lieu of the certificate required under Section 15252 the commissioner shall prepare and file in the office of the Secretary of
 State a certificate of commencement of liquidation proceedings upon taking possession of the business and assets, and the commissioner or his authorized deputy shall countersign the certificate referred to in Sections 15257 and 15258 whenever liquidation is involuntary. The commissioner may, however, prepare and file a final certificate whenever he or she retains possession of the assets of any credit union for the purpose of liquidation. The liquidating agent need not be a member of the credit union to be liquidated, and may be a person, firm, or corporation as determined by the commissioner.

(b) If the commissioner takes possession of the property and business of a California credit union pursuant to Section 14313, the commissioner may tender to the National Credit Union Administration an appointment as conservator or receiver of the California credit union. If the National Credit Union Administration accepts the appointment, the National
 Credit Union Administration shall have, in addition to any powers conferred by federal law, the powers conferred on the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 15.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14316.

The commissioner shall supervise the acts of the liquidating agent or the liquidating committee appointed under this article and may remove the liquidating agent or any member of the liquidating committee in his or her discretion.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 38.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14317.

If required by the commissioner, the liquidating agent or the members of the liquidating committee appointed under this article shall provide proof of bond coverage extending to the liquidating agent or members of the liquidating committee. The bond shall include coverage for fraud, dishonesty, and faithful performance. The premium for that bond shall be paid out of the assets of the credit union.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 39.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14318.

If the commissioner retains possession of the assets of a credit union for purposes of liquidation, the commissioner shall use the services of civil service employees of the commissioner’s office and the attorneys employed by the commissioner or the Department of Justice shall render all necessary legal services, as the commissioner may request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 40.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14319.

In any case where the commissioner takes possession of a subject institution pursuant to this article without a prior notice or hearing, or takes action against a subject person without prior notice or hearing, the commissioner shall, upon taking possession or taking the action, concurrently provide to the subject institution or person a written order. The order shall set forth the condition or conditions of the subject institution or action or actions of the subject person that constitute the basis or bases for the commissioner’s action as to the subject
 institution or subject person. In any case where the commissioner takes possession of a subject institution pursuant to this article, the commissioner shall establish clear evidence upon which he or she is taking action against the subject institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 41.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Costs of Administration [14350. - 14356.]

14350.

The commissioner shall annually levy on and collect from credit unions holding certificates authorizing them to act as credit unions, pro rata on the basis of total assets, an assessment in a total amount that is sufficient in the commissioner’s opinion to (a) meet the expenses of the department in administering this division and other laws relating to credit unions or the credit union business that are not otherwise provided for and (b) provide a reasonable reserve for contingencies.

(History: Repealed (Jan. 1, 1999) and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Adding action operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 539.)
-------------------------------------------

14351.

(a) The amount of the annual assessment on any credit union holding a certificate authorizing it to act as a credit union shall be the greater of (1) two thousand dollars ($2,000) or (2) the sum of the products determined by multiplying (A) increments of the credit union’s total assets by (B) percentages of the base assessment rate, according to the following table: Total AssetsPercentage of Base
Assessment Rate$0–$3,000,00085.0%$3,000,000–$6,000,00025.0%$6,000,000–$10,000,00013.0%$10,000,000–$100,000,00012.5%$100,000,000–$500,000,00012.25%$500,000,000–$1,000,000,00012.0%$1,000,000,000–$2,000,000,00011.5%$2,000,000,000–$5,000,000,0008.0%$5,000,000,000–$10,000,000,0003.5%Excess over $10,000,000,0003.0%(b) The base assessment rate for each annual assessment shall be fixed by the commissioner but shall not exceed two dollars and twenty cents ($2.20) per one thousand dollars ($1,000) of total assets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 115, Sec. 1.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

14352.

For purposes of the annual assessment, the total assets of a credit union holding a certificate authorizing it to act as a credit union shall be determined as of a date fixed by the commissioner. However, if a credit union does not hold a certificate authorizing it to act as a credit union as of that date but does so as of the date when the annual assessment is levied, its total assets for purposes of the annual assessment shall be determined as of the date of the levy.

(History: Repealed (Jan. 1, 1999) and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Adding action operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 539.)
-------------------------------------------

14353.

(a) Whenever the commissioner levies an annual assessment on credit unions holding certificates authorizing them to act as credit unions, the commissioner shall promptly mail or otherwise deliver to each credit union assessed an invoice that shows (1) the amount of the credit union’s annual assessment and (2) the date when the annual assessment is due and payable.

(b) The annual assessment on a credit union holding a certificate authorizing it to act as a credit union becomes
 a liability of the credit union on the date on which the commissioner levies the annual assessment.

(c) If the annual assessment on a credit union holding a certificate authorizing it to act as a credit union is not paid on time, the commissioner shall be entitled to and may collect, in addition to the amount of the annual assessment, a penalty of 5 percent of the amount of the unpaid annual assessment for each month or part of a month that the payment is delinquent.

(History: Repealed (Jan. 1, 1999) and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Adding action operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 539.)
-------------------------------------------

14353.5.

Whenever the commissioner finds it necessary or advisable to make an extra examination of a credit union, the commissioner may charge the credit union a fee for the examination. In determining the fee, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost, including, but not limited to, overhead, for each examiner engaged in the extra examination, and the credit union shall, within 10 days after the mailing or other delivery of a statement by the commissioner, pay the fee charged by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 20, Sec. 12.   (AB 137)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14354.

There is established the Credit Union Fund in the State Treasury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 404, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14355.

All money received or collected by the commissioner under this division or any other law relating to credit unions or the credit union business shall be paid at least once each week, accompanied by a detailed statement thereof, into the State Treasury to the credit of the Credit Union Fund.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14354 (as amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 427) by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 575.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14356.

All expenses of the department in administering this division and other laws relating to credit unions or the credit union business shall be paid out of the Credit Union Fund; and, except as otherwise provided in Section 413 or 414, the Credit Union Fund shall be used only for such purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 64, Sec. 17.   (AB 2742)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Credit Union Advisory Committee [14380. - 14384.]

14380.

There is established in the department a Credit Union Advisory Committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 577.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14381.

The Credit Union Advisory Committee shall advise the commissioner and the Deputy Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation for the Office of Credit Unions on matters relating to credit unions or the credit union business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 117.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14382.

(a) The Credit Union Advisory Committee consists of seven members.

(b) The members of the Credit Union Advisory Committee shall be appointed by the Secretary of Business and Consumer Services.

(c) The term of a member of the Credit Union Advisory Committee is two years. However, a member may be reappointed.

(d) Membership in the Credit Union Advisory Committee is voluntary. No person is required to accept an appointment to the Credit Union Advisory Committee, and any member may resign by filing a resignation with the commissioner.

(e) No member of the Credit Union Advisory Committee shall receive any compensation, reimbursement for expenses, or other payment from the state in connection with service on the Credit Union Advisory Committee.

(f) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 17.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14383.

The Credit Union Advisory Committee shall meet at least once each calendar quarter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 577.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14384.

The commissioner may by order or regulation prescribe rules governing the Credit Union Advisory Committee and its members, including such matters as meetings, quorum, and actions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 577.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Management and Operations [14400. - 14768.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [14400. - 14410.]

14400.

(a) The equity capital of the credit union shall consist of the credit union’s regular reserve account, the undivided earnings account, any appropriated undivided earnings accounts, and other forms of capital approved by the commissioner.

(b) The savings capital of a credit union shall consist of the payments made by members on shares.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 305, Sec. 1.   (AB 2062)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14401.

A credit union may borrow money from any source in an aggregate amount not to exceed 50 percent of the paid-in and unimpaired capital and surplus of the credit union. Loans from the National Credit Union Central Liquidity Facility (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1795 et seq.) shall not be included in computing the aggregate borrowings of a credit union. For the purposes of this division, “certificate for funds” means borrowed money.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 107.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14402.

Every credit union may purchase and hold, either individually or jointly with other credit unions or affiliated organizations, a lot and building to be employed principally for the transaction of business, and to provide for future expansion of the facilities of those organizations. Any excess space that is not occupied by the organizations purchasing and holding the building may be leased to the public. The lot and building may be sold if all the holders of the property join in its sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 172.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14403.

Every credit union may purchase and hold, either individually or jointly with other credit unions or affiliated organizations, furniture, fixtures, vaults, and other personal property necessary or proper to carry on its business, and to equip or furnish any space in any building purchased or held individually or jointly with other credit unions or affiliated organizations under authorization of Section 14402, whether occupied by the credit union or leased to the public. The personal property may be sold, if all the holders of the property join in its sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 811.)
-------------------------------------------

14404.

A credit union shall not invest more than the amounts permitted pursuant to regulations which shall be promulgated by the commissioner for the investments set forth in Sections 14402, 14403, 14650 and 14651.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 743, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 743.)
-------------------------------------------

14405.

Every credit union may:

(a) (1) Become a member of any organization or organizations composed of credit unions, credit associations, chambers of commerce, financial institutions, community economic development entities, or business or trade organizations.

(2) Become a member of any nonprofit organization approved by the board of directors.

(b) Pay
 dues and assessments as may be levied upon it by any organization of which it is a member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 148, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14406.

The savings capital, as defined in Section 14400, undivided profits, and reserve funds of a credit union shall be deposited only in the following:

(a) Commercial banks or trust companies, incorporated under the laws of this state.

(b) National banks doing business in this state.

(c) Shares or periodic certificates for funds received by or any form of evidence of interest or indebtedness issued by any credit union organized under this division or by any other credit union if its member accounts are insured as provided for by Subchapter II of the Federal Credit Union Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1781 et seq.), or, alternatively,
 are insured by other means determined acceptable by the commissioner.

(d) Accounts with, investment certificates or withdrawable shares of, any savings and loan association doing business in this state that is an insured institution pursuant to the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1811 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 305, Sec. 2.   (AB 2062)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14407.

(a) Whenever the losses of any credit union resulting from a depreciation in the value of its securities or otherwise exceed its undivided earnings and reserve fund so that the estimated value of its assets is less than the total amount due its shareholders, the credit union may, if approved by a majority of all members at a meeting called to consider the matter, order a reduction of the liability to each of its shareholders, so as to divide the loss equitably among the shareholders. If thereafter the credit union realizes from its assets
 a greater amount than was fixed in the order of reduction, the excess shall be divided among the shareholders whose assets were reduced, but to the extent of the reduction only.

(b) The commissioner may approve a reduction in the liability on shares approved by less than a majority of all members as provided in subdivision (a) if the commissioner finds, upon the written and verified application filed by the board of directors, that (1) notice of the meeting called to consider the question was mailed to each member entitled to vote upon the question, (2) the notice disclosed the purpose of the meeting and properly informed the membership that approval of the reduction in liability might be sought pursuant to this subdivision, and (3) that a majority of the votes cast upon the question were in favor of the reduction in liability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14408.

No credit union shall make any gift or donation having a value in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) unless the gift or donation is in the best interest of the credit union, is approved by a resolution of the board of directors and is in conformance with any regulation or order that the commissioner may issue. The resolution of the board of directors approving the gift or donation shall identify the recipient of the gift or donation, state the value of the gift or donation, and specify the basis for the board’s determination that the gift or
 donation is in the best interests of the credit union. The board may establish a budget for gifts and donations and authorize appropriate officials of the credit union to select recipients and disburse budgeted funds among those recipients.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 148, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14409.

(a) Every credit union shall obtain adequate bond or insurance coverage, for each director, officer, supervisory committee member, audit committee member, and credit committee member, for the credit manager, and for each employee.

(b) The commissioner may adopt regulations setting forth guidelines with respect to the minimum amount of the bond or insurance coverage deemed adequate. The regulations may be based upon the gross assets of the credit union and may contain a formula or schedule for the calculation of minimum bond or insurance coverage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 762, Sec. 2.   (SB 269)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14409.2.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 1051, 1052, and 1054 of the Labor Code and Section 2947 of the Penal Code, any credit union or officer or employee thereof may deliver fingerprints taken of an applicant for employment by the credit union to local, state, or federal law enforcement agencies for the purpose of obtaining information as to the existence and nature of a criminal record, if any, of the applicant relating to convictions, and to any arrest for which the applicant is released on bail or on his or her own recognizance pending trial, for the commission or attempted commission of a
 crime involving robbery, burglary, theft, embezzlement, fraud, forgery, bookmaking, receiving stolen property, counterfeiting, or involving checks or credit cards or using computers.

(b) The Department of Justice shall, pursuant to Section 11105 of the Penal Code, and a local agency may, pursuant to Section 13300 of the Penal Code, furnish to the officer of the credit union responsible for the final decision regarding employment of the applicant, or to his or her designees having responsibilities for personnel or security decisions in the usual scope and course of their employment with the credit union, summary criminal history information when requested pursuant to this section. If, upon evaluation of the criminal history information received pursuant to this section, the credit union determines that employment of the applicant would constitute an unreasonable risk to the credit union or its customers, the applicant may be denied
 employment.

(c) A request for records pursuant to this section made of the Department of Justice shall be on a form approved by the department. The department may charge a fee to be paid by the requesting credit union pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. No request shall be submitted without the written consent of the applicant.

(d) Any criminal history information obtained pursuant to this section is confidential and no recipient shall disclose its contents other than for the purpose for which it was acquired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1203, Sec. 13.   Effective September 22, 1982.   Operative January 1, 1983, by Sec. 20 of Ch. 1203.)
-------------------------------------------

14410.

(a) (1) A member of the board of directors, supervisory committee, audit committee, or credit committee shall not receive compensation for that member’s services as a member of the board of directors, supervisory committee, audit committee, or credit committee, but the member may be provided with reasonable health, accident, and similar insurance.

(2) This subdivision does not prohibit a member of the board of directors, supervisory committee, audit committee, or credit committee from receiving nonmonetary compensation that is incidental to the person’s service as a member of the board of directors, supervisory committee, audit
 committee, or credit committee, if and as approved by regulation or order of the commissioner.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a director or committee member may be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the performance of that person’s duties if reimbursement is made pursuant to the requirements of the commissioner’s regulations controlling expense reimbursement by the credit union. Reimbursement for actual expenses may include, among other things, travel expenses incurred on or relating to credit union businesses and any other matters, categories, or items of expense that the commissioner establishes by regulation.

(c) This section shall not prevent any person from receiving compensation for actual services as a general manager, credit manager, loan officer,
 or other position as an employee of the credit union.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 762, Sec. 3.   (SB 269)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Directors [14450. - 14456.]

14450.

The credit union shall be directed by a board consisting of an odd number of directors, at least five in number, each of whom shall be a member of the credit union in his own right, to be elected by the members at their annual meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 811.)
-------------------------------------------

14451.

Directors may be elected for a term of three years or less. If directors are elected for terms in excess of one year their terms of office shall be staggered so that insofar as possible an equal number of such terms shall expire each year.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14452.

The office of any director shall be declared vacant if such director is absent from three consecutive regular meetings of the board of directors unless excused therefrom.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14452.5.

A vacancy on the board of directors shall be filled in accordance with Section 7224 of the Corporations Code, subject to the following:

(a) A vacancy that exists due to the expiration of the term of a director shall be filled only by the members of a credit union.

(b) If the board of directors elects a director to fill a vacancy, the director so elected shall hold office only until the next annual meeting at which time the members
 shall elect a director to hold office until the expiration of the term for which elected.

(c) If the members elect a director to fill a vacancy, the director so elected shall hold office until the expiration of the term for which elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14453.

The board of directors of every credit union shall have the general management of the affairs, funds, and records of the credit union. The board shall meet on a regular basis, not less than quarterly, as reasonably determined by the board. The board may appoint an executive committee of no fewer than three directors, to serve at its pleasure, to act as expressly approved by the board of directors in accordance with the laws and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 353, Sec. 3.   (AB 2274)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14454.

The directors shall hold a meeting of all directors within 10 days after the annual meeting of members pursuant to Section 14804 for the purpose of electing the officers of the credit union as prescribed in Sections 14500 and 14501.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 951, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14456.

Unless the bylaws expressly reserve any or all of the following duties to the members, the directors have all of the following special duties:

(a) (1) To act upon all applications for membership. The directors may delegate the power to approve applications for new membership to either of the following, pursuant to a written membership plan adopted by the board of directors:

(A) The chairperson of a membership committee or an executive committee.

(B) An officer, director, committee member, or employee.

(2) The directors or their delegates may utilize an automated system to
 establish membership eligibility pursuant to a written membership plan adopted by the board of directors if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The automated system is regularly tested for compliance with Section 14800, the credit union’s field of membership, and applicable laws and regulations.

(B) An application for new membership approved using an automated system is reviewed by the directors or their delegates within five business days to ensure compliance with subparagraph (A).

(C) The written membership plan includes a plan to address an approved application determined not to be in compliance with subparagraph (A).

(b) (1) To expel members for any of the following causes, subject to Section 14801:

(A) Conviction of a criminal offense involving moral turpitude.

(B) Failure to carry out contracts, agreements, or obligations with the credit union.

(C) Refusal to comply with the provisions of this division or of the bylaws.

(D) Abusive, threatening, or harassing behavior toward credit union staff, volunteers, or members, or the abuse of credit union systems or property.

(2) The directors may delegate the power to expel members for cause to a membership committee or an executive committee, pursuant to a written membership plan adopted by the board of directors.

(3) (A) An expulsion pursuant to
 subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) may take effect immediately, without advance notice or an opportunity to be heard, if the board of directors, or its designee pursuant to subdivision (b), determines that immediate expulsion is reasonably necessary for the protection of the credit union or its staff, volunteers, or members.

(B) A member expelled pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be provided written notice within five business days after the effective date of that expulsion.

(C) This paragraph shall not prohibit a member expelled pursuant to subparagraph (A) from appealing that expulsion pursuant to paragraph (4).

(D) An expulsion pursuant to this paragraph shall be deemed to be fair and reasonable pursuant to Section 7341 of the Corporations Code.

(4) (A) A member who is expelled by the board of directors, or its designee, has the right to appeal therefrom to the board of directors, pursuant to reasonable procedures adopted by the board.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “reasonable procedures” shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(i) Written notice to the expelled member of the effective date of the expulsion.

(ii) The right to appeal therefrom and the procedures for doing so.

(iii) Written notice of the board’s final determination following an appeal.

(c) To determine from time to time the interest rate on obligations with members and to authorize the payment of interest
 refunds to borrowing members. The board of directors may delegate this duty pursuant to subdivision (l).

(d) To fix the maximum number of shares that may be held by, and, in accordance with Section 15100, establish the maximum amount of obligations which may be entered into with, any one member.

(e) To declare dividends on shares in accordance with the credit union’s policies and to determine the interest rate or rates that will be paid on certificates for funds. The board of directors may delegate this duty pursuant to subdivision (l).

(f) To amend the bylaws, except where membership approval is required.

(g) To fill vacancies in the credit committee, and to temporarily fill vacancies caused by the suspension of any or all members of the credit
 committee, pending a meeting of the members to determine whether to affirm the suspension and vacate the office, or to reinstate the member or members.

(h) To direct the deposit or investment of funds, except loans to members.

(i) To designate alternate members of the credit committee who shall serve in the absence or inability of the regular members to perform their duties.

(j) To perform or authorize any action not inconsistent with law or regulation and not specifically reserved by the bylaws for the members and to perform any other duties as the bylaws prescribe.

(k) For purposes of this section, “membership committee” means a committee of at least three persons appointed by the board of directors, provided that the number of members on the